Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.350

Board authorized to contract indebtedness and issue revenue bonds.

The board of parks and recreation commissioners is hereby authorized for the purpose of carrying out the lawful powers granted to park and recreation districts by the laws of the state to contract indebtedness and to issue revenue bonds evidencing such indebtedness in conformity with this chapter.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 94 s 3.]